Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.13.030

Dissent by nominees and beneficial owners.

(1) A record shareholder may assert dissenters' rights as to fewer than all the shares registered in the shareholder's name only if the shareholder dissents with respect to all shares beneficially owned by any one person and delivers to the corporation a notice of the name and address of each person on whose behalf the shareholder asserts dissenters' rights. The rights of a partial dissenter under this subsection are determined as if the shares as to which the dissenter dissents and the dissenter's other shares were registered in the names of different shareholders.

(2) A beneficial shareholder may assert dissenters' rights as to shares held on the beneficial shareholder's behalf only if:

(a) The beneficial shareholder delivers to the corporation the record shareholder's executed written consent to the dissent not later than the time the beneficial shareholder asserts dissenters' rights; and

(b) The beneficial shareholder does so with respect to all shares of which such shareholder is the beneficial shareholder or over which such shareholder has power to direct the vote.

[ 2020 c 57 s 68; 2002 c 297 s 35; 1989 c 165 s 142.]